Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2058
Acupuncture; license required; standard of care.

It is unlawful to practice acupuncture on a person in this state unless the acupuncturist is licensed to practice acupuncture under the Uniform Credentialing Act. An acupuncturist licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act shall provide the same standard of care to patients as that provided by a person licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathy, or osteopathic medicine and surgery. An acupuncturist licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act shall refer a patient to an appropriate practitioner when the problem of the patient is beyond the training, experience, or competence of the acupuncturist.

Laws 2001, LB 270, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,346;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 716;

Laws 2017, LB19, § 1.